Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8130.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-87-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-87 entitled "Rhode Island
Prekindergarten Education Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-87-3. Planning phase for a prekindergarten program Rhode Island
prekindergarten program.
(a) The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education ("the
department") shall begin planning an initial, pilot maintain a prekindergarten program that meets
high quality standards, builds on the existing early childhood education infrastructure in the state
(including child care, Head Start and public schools) and serves children ages three (3) and four (4)
who reside in communities with concentrations of low performing schools. This planning phase
will develop specific goals to expand the pilot prekindergarten program over time and will also
identify opportunities to strengthen care and learning programs for infants and toddlers years.
(b) During this planning phase, Annually, the Rhode Island department of elementary and
secondary education will shall quantify the resources needed to achieve and maintain high quality
standards in prekindergarten programs and identify incentives and supports to develop a qualified
early education workforce, including opportunities for experienced early childhood educators and
paraprofessionals to acquire college degrees and earn early childhood teacher certification.
(c) The Rhode Island Annually, the department of elementary and secondary education will
begin to develop plans to shall collect and analyze data regarding the impact of the pilot state

prekindergarten program on participating children’s school readiness and school achievement.
(d) The department shall conduct a lottery to determine enrollment in the state
prekindergarten program, pursuant to § 16-87-3.1.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-87 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Prekindergarten
Education Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following sections:
16-87-3.1. Lottery for the Rhode Island prekindergarten program.
(a) As used in this section and § 16-87-3.2, the following words shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Participating in the state prekindergarten program" means a municipality that receives
funding from the state to create or maintain slots in a classroom for three (3) or four (4) year-olds.
(2) "Preferred program" means a program(s) selected by the family of a potential
prekindergarten student when applying to enter the prekindergarten lottery. Families shall not be
permitted to identify their preferred program(s) from a list of prekindergarten programs operating
in any municipality participating in the state prekindergarten program.
(3) "Siblings" means students who are related by blood, marriage, or co-residence of their
parents.
(4) "Students who are economically disadvantaged" means students who qualify for free
or reduced lunch.
(b) To be eligible for the lottery, a student shall be:
(1) A resident of a community participating in the state prekindergarten program; and
(2) Four (4) years of age by September 1 of the lottery year.
(c) The prekindergarten lottery shall be conducted to consider the following:
(1) A family’s preferred program;
(2) Siblings that are already enrolled in a particular prekindergarten program; and
(3) The economic demographics of the municipality in which the prekindergarten program
operates.
(d) The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate
rules and regulations regarding the operation of the lottery for state-funded prekindergarten seats
pursuant to this section.
16-87-3.2. Enrollment at Rhode Island prekindergarten programs.
(a) Effective July 1, 2026, any prekindergarten program (a "program") located in any
municipality participating in the state prekindergarten program may accept students into their
program who are not residents of the municipality in which the program operates; provided that,
all of the following conditions are present:
LC005704 - Page 2 of 4

(1) The program has open slots available;
(2) The student is otherwise eligible for the prekindergarten program; and
(3) The student is selected by the prekindergarten lottery.
(b) The acceptance of students into a program who are not residents of the municipality in
which the program operates shall not, in and of itself, cause a loss or reduction in state or local
education aid to the program.
(c) No student shall be excluded from a prekindergarten program who has a sibling enrolled
in that prekindergarten program based on the fact that the student lives in a different municipality.
(d) The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate
rules and regulations regarding the enrollment at state-funded prekindergarten seats pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005704
========
LC005704 - Page 3 of 4